test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-swda44_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - sõda: # Noun (44) sõda 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
    sõda+N+Sg+Nom: sõda
    sõda+N+Sg+Gen: sõa
    sõda+N+Sg+Par: sõta
    sõda+N+Sg+Ill: sõta
    sõda+N+Sg+Ine: [sõan, sõah, sõahn]
    sõda+N+Sg+Ela: sõast
    sõda+N+Sg+All: sõalõ
    sõda+N+Sg+Ade: sõal
    sõda+N+Sg+Abl: sõalt
    sõda+N+Sg+Tra: sõas
    sõda+N+Sg+Ter: sõaniq
    sõda+N+Sg+Abe: sõaldaq
    sõda+N+Sg+Com: sõagaq
    sõda+N+Pl+Nom: sõaq
    sõda+N+Pl+Gen: sõto
    sõda+N+Pl+Par: sõto
    sõda+N+Pl+Ill: [sõttohe, sõtto, sõttodõ]
    sõda+N+Pl+Ine: [sõton, sõtoh, sõtohn, sõon, sõoh, sõohn]
    sõda+N+Pl+Ela: [sõtost, sõost]
    sõda+N+Pl+All: [sõtolõ, sõolõ]
    sõda+N+Pl+Ade: [sõtol, sõol]
    sõda+N+Pl+Abl: [sõtolt, sõolt]
    sõda+N+Pl+Tra: [sõtos, sõos]
    sõda+N+Pl+Ter: [sõtoniq, sõoniq]
    sõda+N+Pl+Abe: [sõtoldaq, sõoldaq]
    sõda+N+Pl+Com: sõtogaq
